Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 25. Sheriffs
§ 19-25-57.
Property delivered to successor sheriff.

Every sheriff who shall have levied an execution or other process on goods and chattels which shall remain in his possession unsold at the expiration of his term of office, shall deliver the same to his successor in office, taking his receipt therefor. The sheriff to whom such goods and chattels are delivered shall sell the same in like manner as his predecessor ought to have done had he remained in office, and shall pay the proceeds of the sale to the parties entitled thereto. If any sheriff fails to deliver to his successor any goods and chattels so levied on and remaining in his hands, on demand therefor, the plaintiff in the execution or other process, upon five days’ notice thereof, may move the court from which the writ issued, against the sheriff so failing, and his sureties and their executors and administrators, upon which motion judgment shall be entered for the amount of the execution or other process, with interest, and five percent (5%) damages and costs.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (11); 1857, ch. 6, art 126; 1871, § 232; 1880, § 338; 1892, § 4126; 1906, § 4678; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3095; 1930, § 3325; 1942, § 4250.

§ 19-25-59.
Mesne process docket kept by sheriff.

It shall be the duty of every sheriff to keep a record, to be called the “Mesne Process Docket,” in which he shall note each writ, other than an execution, received by him for service, specifying the names of the parties, the court from which issued, the date of its reception, how executed, and when and how returned. The record shall be kept as a public record, and turned over to his successor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4127; 1906, § 4679; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3096; 1930, § 3326; 1942, § 4251; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 35, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 19-25-61.
Execution docket kept by sheriff.

It shall be the duty of every sheriff to keep a record, to be called the “Execution docket,” in which he shall note each execution received by him, specifying the names of all the parties, the amount and date of the judgment, the court from which issued and when returnable, the amount of the costs, the date when the same was received, and all levies and other proceedings had thereon. The record shall be kept by the sheriff as a public record, and at the expiration of the term of office of such sheriff, it shall be delivered to his successor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 9 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art 127; 1871, § 233; 1880, § 339; 1892 § 4128; 1906, § 4680; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3097; 1930, § 3327; 1942, § 4252; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 36, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 19-25-63.
Jail docket kept by sheriff.

It shall be the duty of every sheriff to keep a record, to be called the “Jail docket,” in which he shall note each warrant or mittimus by which any person shall be received into or placed in the jail of his county, entering the nature of the writ or warrant, by whom issued, the name of the prisoner, when received, the date of the arrest and commitment, for what crime or other cause the party is imprisoned, and on what authority, how long the prisoner was so imprisoned, how released or discharged, and the warrant therefor or the receipt of the officer of the penitentiary when sent there. All of said entries shall be full and complete, so as to give a perfect history of each case. The record shall be kept as a public record, and turned over to his successor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4129; 1906, § 4681; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3098; 1930, § 3328; 1942, § 4253; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 37, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 19-25-65.
Sheriff to serve as county librarian.

The sheriff shall be the custodian of the books other than record books belonging to the county, and he shall keep the Mississippi Department Reports, census reports, statutes of the state, the “Mississippi Reports,” digests, and legislative journals assigned to his county in a suitable and safe bookcase in the courtroom of the courthouse. He shall keep them well bound in leather, or stiff boards with leather back and corners, to be paid for out of the county treasury on the order of the board of supervisors, and he shall preserve them in good condition. He shall be fined Ten Dollars ($10.00) by the court, either circuit or chancery, as for a contempt, for each volume belonging to the county and which has passed into his custody that shall be out of the courtroom at any term of court. He shall also receive and preserve in the same way all books of every kind, maps, charts, and other like things that may be donated to the county by the state, the United States, from individuals or other sources. He shall not permit any of the books in his keeping to be carried out of the courthouse.

The sheriff shall, in case of binding or rebinding of books belonging to the county, cause the statutes of the state to be labeled “Laws of Mississippi,” and the year of their enactment shall appear thereon. If the reports and digests or code are rebound, they shall be labeled as they were originally.

In his settlement with the clerk of the board of supervisors for the month of December of each calendar year, the sheriff shall file with the said clerk a sworn itemized statement of the volumes of the Mississippi Reports on hand in the county library on the last business day of said month, and for all volumes missing since the settlement for the previous December the clerk shall debit the said sheriff in his said settlement at the rate of Four Dollars ($4.00) for each of said missing volumes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 4133, 4134; 1906, §§ 4685, 4686; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3102, 3103; 1930, §§ 3332, 3333; 1942, §§ 4257, 4258; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 66, eff from and after January 1, 1972.

§ 19-25-67.
Duty of sheriff to keep the peace.

It shall be the duty of every sheriff to keep the peace within his county, by causing all offenders in his view to enter into bonds, with sureties, for keeping the peace and for appearing at the next circuit court, and by committing such offenders in case of refusal. He shall certify and return said bonds to the court. It shall be his duty to quell riots, routs, affrays and unlawful assemblages, and to prevent lynchings and mob violence, and wherever necessary he shall call to his aid the power of the county. Any person who shall fail, neglect or refuse to respond to the call of the sheriff for such aid shall be reported by the sheriff to the circuit court, and it shall be his duty to prosecute all such persons, who, upon conviction, shall be punished as for a misdemeanor. He shall pursue, apprehend, and commit to jail all persons charged with treason, felony, or other crimes. He may take bonds, with good and sufficient sureties, of any person whom he may arrest with or without a warrant for any felony that is bailable as a matter of law. He may fix the amount of such bonds, only in emergency circumstances. “Emergency circumstances” means a situation in which a person is arrested without a warrant and cannot be taken before a judicial officer for a determination of probable cause within a reasonable time, or within forty-eight (48) hours, whichever is the lesser, after the arrest.

Any sheriff who wilfully fails, neglects or refuses to perform any of his duties as prescribed in this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and prosecuted therefor, and upon conviction thereof he shall be removed from office.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (13); 1857, ch. 6, art 129; 1871, § 235; 1880 § 340; 1892 § 4130; 1906, § 4682; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3099; 1930, § 3329; 1942, § 4254; Laws, 1995, ch. 319, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 19-25-69.
Sheriff to have charge of courthouse, jail and protection of prisoners.

The sheriff shall have charge of the courthouse and jail of his county, of the premises belonging thereto, and of the prisoners in said jail. He shall preserve the said premises and prisoners from mob violence, from any injuries or attacks by mobs or otherwise, and from trespasses and intruders. He shall keep the courthouse, jail, and premises belonging thereto, in a clean and comfortable condition, and it shall be his duty to prosecute all persons who are guilty of injuring or defacing same. If, after a hearing by the Governor, held in accordance with due process of law, it shall be ascertained that the sheriff has wilfully failed, neglected or refused to preserve the courthouse, or the jail, or any prisoners lawfully in his custody from injuries by mob violence, then the Governor shall have the power and it shall be his duty to remove such sheriff from office.

However, in the case of a jail owned jointly by a county and municipality, under the provisions of Section 17-5-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, after the appointment of a jailer, pursuant to Section 47-1-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, responsible for all municipal prisoners lodged in said jail, neither the sheriff nor his bondsmen shall be responsible for actual maintenance or operation of said jail, insofar as municipal prisoners are concerned.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 136; 1871, § 242; 1880, § 342; 1892, § 4132; 1906, § 4684; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3101; 1930, § 3331; 1942, § 4256; Laws, 1966, ch. 369, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).

§ 19-25-71.
Sheriff to serve as jailer; separate rooms by gender; training.

The sheriff shall be the jailer of his county and, in the performance of his duties as jailer, he shall employ a jailer or jailers to have charge of the prisoners in the jail. However, in any county in which there is a jointly owned jail, the jailer, pursuant to Section 47-1-49, shall be the person appointed by the governing authorities of the municipality insofar as municipal prisoners are concerned. The sheriff shall keep in the jail thereof separate rooms by gender, and shall not permit any communication between a male and a female prisoner, unless they be married.

The board of supervisors of the county shall pay the tuition, living and travel expenses incurred by a person in attending and participating in the basic and continuing education courses for county jail officers.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 3 (15); 1857, ch. 6, art 131; 1871, § 237; 1880, § 343; 1892, § 4136; 1906, § 4687; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3104; 1930, § 3334; 1942, § 4259; Laws, 1896, p 153; Laws, 1966, ch. 369, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 552, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 482, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 19-25-73.
Feeding of prisoners; alternative methods of funding.

In respect to the feeding of prisoners by the sheriff’s office, the board of supervisors is authorized to choose one (1) of the following methods:

It shall only contract with a local caterer or restaurant owner to bring in food for the prisoners, and the contract shall be awarded after taking bids as provided by law for other county contracts.

The sheriff shall purchase, in the name of the county, all necessary food and related supplies to be used for feeding prisoners only in the county jail. All purchases of such food and supplies shall be invoiced to the county and placed on the claims docket of the board of supervisors for disposition in the same manner as all other claims against the county. All wages and other compensation for services rendered to the sheriff in connection with the feeding of prisoners shall be submitted to and approved by the board of supervisors as other wages or compensation paid to employees of the sheriff. The total expenditure for such purpose under this method shall not exceed Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) per day per prisoner, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section. All payments and reimbursements from any source for the keeping of prisoners shall be received and paid into the general fund of the county.

The board of supervisors may negotiate a contract with the board of trustees of the local public community hospital to bring in food for the prisoners.

The board of supervisors may authorize the sheriff to maintain a bank account entitled “jail food allowance account” into which shall be deposited all receipts for feeding and keeping prisoners in the county jail, including payments from the board of supervisors at the rate not to exceed Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) per prisoner per day and all such receipts from municipalities, the United States and any other jurisdictions required to pay the cost of feeding or keeping prisoners contained in the jail. He shall maintain a receipts journal and a disbursements journal, in a form to be prescribed by the State Department of Audit, which will provide the information necessary to determine the actual cost of feeding the prisoners, which shall not exceed Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) per prisoner per day, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section. All costs and expenses for such feeding shall be paid from the jail food allowance account and supported by properly itemized invoices. Any funds accumulating in the jail food allowance account in excess of the monthly average expenditures, plus ten percent (10%) for contingencies, shall be paid into the county general fund at least once each calendar quarter.

In the event that prisoners are housed in the county jail by any political subdivision of the state, the county may charge the political subdivision for housing, feeding and otherwise caring for such prisoners an amount not to exceed the payments provided under state law for the keeping in the county jail of persons committed, sentenced or otherwise placed under the custody of the Department of Corrections. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect payments by the Department of Corrections set by state law for the keeping in the county jail of persons committed, sentenced or otherwise placed under the custody of the Department of Corrections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4259.5; Laws, 1972, ch. 463, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 457, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 481; Laws, 1982, ch. 337; Laws, 1991, ch. 460, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991; Laws, 2019, ch. 371, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 19-25-74.
Feeding of prisoners; log of meals served.

In any event, regardless of which method in respect to the feeding of prisoners is selected by the board of supervisors, the sheriff shall maintain a log, showing the name of each prisoner, the date and time of incarceration and release, to be posted daily, which shall record the number of meals served to prisoners at each mealtime, and the hours of the day served, and shall make affidavit as to the correctness thereof and file the same monthly with the board of supervisors. Such log shall remain on file with the board of supervisors as other records of said board and shall be made available to the state department of audit upon request. No claims for the cost or expenses of feeding prisoners shall be approved by the board of supervisors for any month unless and until such log for that month is filed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 457, § 2, eff from and after October 1, 1976.

§ 19-25-75.
Additional guards for jail.

If the jail be insufficient or if there be danger of escape, lynching or rescue of any prisoner therein, or danger of an attack upon the jail by any person or persons, or if there be no jail, or if the sheriff or jailer shall have any person or persons lawfully in his custody and there be danger of the seizure, lynching, escape or rescue of any such person or persons, or if mob violence has been threatened against any such person or persons, it shall be the duty of the sheriff or jailer to summon a sufficient guard to protect and secure such prisoner, or to protect the jail, so long as the same may be necessary and no longer. The sheriff or jailer shall furnish to the circuit court of his county a certified list of all persons thus summoned, who served as such guard, together with the length of time each thus served, and he shall furnish to the court and also to the grand jury a list of all persons thus summoned who failed, neglected or refused to heed the summons of the sheriff or jailer. The circuit court upon due proof may allow to each person not more than Five Dollars ($5.00) for each day and night he may have been employed as guard, or at this rate for a greater time, to be paid out of the county treasury upon the order of the court and the issuance of a warrant therefor by the board of supervisors. This section shall not authorize the employment of permanent guards for the jail or for prisoners away from the jail, but only in an emergency. All persons summoned by the sheriff or jailer under the provisions of this section who shall fail, neglect or refuse to obey said summons shall, upon conviction, be punished as for a misdemeanor, and it shall be the duty of the circuit judge to charge the grand jury especially in this regard.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 6 (31); 1857, ch. 6, art 135; 1871, § 241; 1880, § 344; 1892, § 4138; 1906, § 4689; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3106; 1930, § 3336; 1942, § 4261; Laws, 1966, ch. 369, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).

§ 19-25-77.
Support of prisoner confined for contempt.

When a prisoner in custody for contempt of court shall be unable to support himself, the sheriff shall be allowed the same compensation for the support of such person as is allowed for keeping other prisoners, to be paid in the same way out of the county treasury. Such person shall not be detained in prison for such fees.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art 5 (178); 1857, ch. 6, art 133; 1871, § 239; 1880, § 346; 1892, § 4140; 1906, § 4691; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3108; 1930, § 3338; 1942, § 4263.

§ 19-25-79.
Sheriff to receive and keep prisoner committed by justice.

The sheriff of any county shall receive and keep any prisoner committed by a justice of the peace according to the order of commitment.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 65, art 2 (75); 1871, § 1324; 1880, § 2219; 1892, § 4141; 1906, § 4692; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3109; 1930, § 3339; 1942, § 4264.

§ 19-25-81.
Sheriff to receive and keep prisoners from United States officers.

It shall be the duty of all sheriffs as jailors to receive and safely keep, until discharged by due course of law, all prisoners arrested or committed under legal process from the officers of the courts of the United States, if the officer or person delivering such prisoner shall secure to the sheriff as jailor the amount of subsistence, bedding, fuel, clothing, medicine and medical fees allowed by law in such cases. No sheriff as jailor shall receive or keep any such prisoner where the receiving or keeping of such prisoner would tax the capacity of the jail in his county to the extent that there would not be sufficient room in said jail to safely keep and care for state and county prisoners in his custody or where the receiving or keeping of said prisoner would render such jail unduly unsanitary or dangerous to the health of the prisoners confined therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 38, art 3; 1857, ch. 64, art 281; 1871, § 2781; 1880, § 3031; 1892, § 4142; 1906, § 4693; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3110; 1930, § 3340; 1942, § 4265; Laws, 1888, p 84; Laws, 1928, ch. 234.

§ 19-25-83.
Maintenance and use of canine corps.

The sheriff shall keep those hounds bought pursuant to Section 19-5-3, closely confined in the jail yard or in some suitable inclosure to be provided for them, and he shall not permit any person to handle or in any way to be familiar with them except himself and one other person to assist each sheriff, which person shall be designated by him and who shall assist the sheriff in taking care of said dogs and training them. The sheriff or his assistant shall at frequent intervals exercise said dogs by having someone for them to trail, to the end that their instinct may be kept active. The sheriff on receiving information of the commission of a felony in his county or the escape of prisoners in his custody, and that the person charged with the commission thereof is at large and has left the scene of the crime and is a fugitive from justice, shall convey the said dogs to the place where said felony was committed and endeavor to capture the fugitive or escaped prisoners, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 330; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3703; 1930, § 236; 1942, § 2914; Laws, 1896, ch. 139; Laws, 1962, ch. 244, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 19-25-85.
Duties of sheriff of Harrison County in separate judicial district.

The sheriff of Harrison County shall be the proper officer to execute all process required by law to be executed by the sheriff and to return the same to such district of said county as the same may belong. He shall keep an office at Gulfport therein, and an office at Biloxi therein, and in each of said offices he shall keep all books, records, and documents required by law to be kept by sheriffs in every county in the state, the same as if said two districts were separate counties. In making sales of land under execution or otherwise in the discharge of any of his official duties, such lands as lie in the first district, he shall sell at the door of the courthouse in Gulfport and in making like sales of land lying in the second district he shall sell the same at the door of the courthouse at Biloxi. Sales of personalty made by the sheriff under like authority shall be made in such places in each district, as if each were a separate county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2910-04; Laws, 1962, ch. 257, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 19-25-87.
Authority of sheriff to receive funds from federal government and to expend such funds.

The sheriff of any county in which the federal government owns land is hereby authorized, with the approval of the board of supervisors, to receive funds from the corps of engineers of the United States Army for the purpose of defraying expenses incident to providing law enforcement on federally owned land. Such funds shall be kept in a separate account and may be expended by the sheriff, with the approval of the board of supervisors, for equipment, supplies, materials and deputies’ salaries as necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 381, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1980).